Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2059
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298; Laws 2015, LB157, § 10. Operative date January 1, 2017. Voting entitlement of shares.

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section or unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, each outstanding share, regardless of class, shall be entitled to one vote on each matter voted on at a shareholders' meeting. Only shares shall be entitled to vote.

(2) Absent special circumstances, the shares of a corporation shall not be entitled to vote if they are owned, directly or indirectly, by a second corporation, domestic or foreign, and the first corporation owns, directly or indirectly, a majority of the shares entitled to vote for directors of the second corporation.

(3) Subsection (2) of this section shall not limit the power of a corporation to vote any shares, including its own shares, held by it in a fiduciary capacity.

(4) Redeemable shares shall not be entitled to vote after notice of redemption has been mailed to the holders and a sum sufficient to redeem the shares has been deposited with a bank, trust company, or other financial institution under an irrevocable obligation to pay the holders the redemption price upon surrender of the shares.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 59.